bg-BG: Формат на опаковката: Изкачащи листове; Предварително нарязани листове; Ролки; Квадратно опаковане; Друго
th: รูปแบบการห่อ: แผ่นดึงต่อเนื่อง; แผ่นปลายตัดสำเร็จรูป; แบบม้วน; แผ่นทรงสี่เหลี่ยม; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 包装形式: 抽取式; 预切片; 卷装; 方形包装; 其他
fr: Format du film alimentaire: Feuilles prédécoupées; Feuilles prédécoupées; Rouleaux; Feuilles carrées; Autre
tr: Ambalaj formu: Pop-up yaprak; Hazır kesilmiş levha; Rulo; Kare sargı; Diğer
vi: Định dạng màng bọc: Giấy rút; Tấm cắt sẵn; Cuộn; Giấy gói hình vuông; Khác
pt-BR: Formato do embrulho: Folhas destacáveis; Tiras pré-cortada; Rolos; Embalagens quadradas; Outro
sk-SK: Formát balenia: Vysúvacie kusy; Predrezané listy; Rolky; Štvorcové obaly; Iné
zh-TW: 保鮮膜形式: 快抽鋁箔; 預裁切片; 滾動; 方形包裝紙; 其他
nb: Omslagsformat: Uttrekksark; Forhåndskuttede ark; Ruller; Firkantpakning; Annet
el: Μορφή περιτυλίγματος: Αναδυόμενα φύλλα; Κομμένα φύλλα; Ρολά; Square περιτυλίγματα; Άλλο
cs: Formát obalu: Předřezané listy; Archy; Role; Čtvercové obaly; Jiné
de: Format der Lebensmittelverpackung: Vorgeschnittene Popup-Folie; Vorgeschnittene Blätter; Rollen; Quadratisch; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Format omota: Listovi s pojedinačnim izvlačenjem; Unaprijed izrezane plahte; Role; Kvadratni omoti; Ostalo
nl: Verpakkingsvorm: Voorgesneden vellen; Voorgesneden vellen; Rollen; Verikante wraps; Overig
sv: Förpackningsformat: popup-butiksark; Förskurna ark; Rullar; Square omslag; Annat
pl: Format zawijania: Arkusze wysuwane; Arkusze wstępnie przycięte; Role; Arkusze kwadratowe; Inne
en: Wrap format: Pop-up sheets; Pre-cut sheets; Rolls; Square wraps; Other
ja: ラップの形式: ポップアップシート; プリカットシート; ロール; スクエアラップ; その他
da: Indpakningsformat: Pop op-ark; Forudskårne ark; Ruller; Firkantede indpakninger; Andet
lt-LT: Pakuotės formatas: Ištraukiami lapeliai; Iš anksto supjaustyti lapai; Ritinėliai; Kvadratiniai įvyniojimai; Kita
hu: Csomagolás formája: Kihúzható lapok; Előre levágott lapok; Tekercsek; Négyzet alakú lapok; Egyéb
pt-PT: Formato do invólucro: Folhas de extração automática; Folhas pré-cortadas; Rolos; Embrulho quadrado; Outro
ko: 랩 형태: 팝업 시트; 낱장형; 롤; 스퀘어 랩; 기타
ru: Формат упаковочной пленки: Подающиеся листы; Нарезанные листы; Рулоны; Квадратные обертки; Другое
ro-RO: Formatul foliei: Foi pop-up; Foi pre-tăiate; Role; Ambalaje pătrate; Altele
fi: Kääreen formaatti: Arkkipakkaus; Esileikatut arkit; Rullat; Neliönmuotoiset kääreet; Muu
es: Formato del envoltorio: Hojas de puestos temporales; Tiras precortadas; Rollos; Envolturas cuadradas; Otros
sl-SI: Oblika zavijanja: Pojavni listi; Predrezani listi; Zvitki; Square ovoji; Druga
it: Formato dell'involucro: Fogli pop-up; Fogli pretagliati; Rotoli; Involucri Square; Altro